Louisiana, session 2026, HB374.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 313(C)(1) and (2) are hereby
amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 230.1(E), 313(E), and
320(G)(4) and (J)(4) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 230.1. Maximum time for appearance before judge for the purpose of
appointment of counsel; court discretion to fix bail at the appearance;
extension of time limit for cause; effect of failure of appearance
* * *
E. The arresting law enforcement agency shall notify the prosecuting
authority with jurisdiction over the arrested person within twenty-four hours of the
arrest when the person is arrested for any of the following that directly involves a
victim who is under the age of eighteen:
(1) A crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B) that is a felony.
(2) A sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-717 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 374
Art. 313. Gwen's Law; bail hearings; detention without bail
* * *
C.(1) A contradictory bail hearing, as provided for in this Paragraph, shall
be held prior to setting bail for a person in custody who is charged with the
commission of a sex offense and who has been previously convicted of a sex offense.
No bail shall be set until the court has received and reviewed the criminal history
record information, as defined in R.S. 15:541, of the defendant and rendered a
determination as to whether the defendant has an applicable prior conviction as
described in Subparagraph (5) of this Paragraph.
(2) The court, after having been given notice of an applicable prior
conviction as described in Subparagraph (5) of this Paragraph, shall order a
contradictory hearing to be held within five days of receiving notice of the prior
conviction, exclusive of weekends and legal holidays.
* * *
E.(1) A contradictory bail hearing, as provided in this Paragraph, shall be
held prior to setting bail for a person in custody who is charged with the commission
of any of the following that directly involves a victim who is under the age of
eighteen:
(a) A crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B) that is a felony.
(b) A sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
(2) The court, upon request of the prosecuting authority that is made within
seventy-two hours of arrest, shall order a contradictory hearing to be held within
seventy-two hours of receipt of such request unless continued for good cause shown,
exclusive of weekends and legal holidays. The defendant shall be temporarily
detained pending the contradictory hearing.
(3) The provisions of this Paragraph do not apply if the prosecuting authority
waives the contradictory hearing.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-717 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 374
Art. 320. Conditions of bail undertaking
* * *
G.
* * *
(4) When the defendant is alleged to have committed an offense that is a sex
offense as defined in R.S. 15:541 against a victim who is under the age of eighteen,
the defendant shall not be released on bail until a Uniform Abuse Prevention Order
has been issued, filed into the record, and served upon the defendant, unless the court
conducts a hearing and makes a finding on the record that such an order is not
necessary.
* * *
J.
* * *
(4) When the defendant is alleged to have committed a felony offense that
is a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B) against a victim who is under the
age of eighteen, the defendant shall not be released on bail until a Uniform Abuse
Prevention Order has been issued, filed into the record, and served upon the
defendant, unless the court conducts a hearing and makes a finding on the record that
such an order is not necessary.
* * *